Maryland, session 2025, HB1162.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
9A–103.
This title does not limit the right of:
– 1 –

Ch. 386 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) an individual owner of a single–family dwelling while that owner is
practicing heating, ventilation, air–conditioning, or refrigeration services on or within a
building or structure owned by the individual;
(2) an individual who is building a single–family dwelling in which that
individual will reside while practicing heating, ventilation, air–conditioning, or
refrigeration services on or within that dwelling;
(3) an employee of a public utility company regulated by the Public Service
Commission, when engaged in:
(i) the development, construction, maintenance, or repair of electric
or gas facilities located in the State; or
(ii) the construction, maintenance, or repair of electric or gas
appliances in the service area of the public utility;
(4) subject to § 9A–403(a) of this title, an employee of the United States
government, the State government, a local government, or an independent agency while
that employee is practicing heating, ventilation, air–conditioning, or refrigeration services
on or within buildings or structures owned or solely occupied by the United States
government, the State government, a local government, or an independent agency;
(5) an individual employed in the installation, maintenance, alteration,
repair, or replacement of self–contained appliances requiring not more than 225 volts or 25
amperes of electrical current;
(6) an individual possessing a master electrician’s license issued by the
State or any county, when engaged in the installation, alteration, service, repair, or
replacement of individually controlled electric resistance heat;
(7) an individual possessing a master plumber’s license issued by the State,
Baltimore County, or the Washington Suburban Sanitary Commission when providing
heating, ventilation, air–conditioning, or refrigeration services on hydronic heating
systems;
(8) an individual possessing a license to practice engineering when
providing heating, ventilation, air–conditioning, or refrigeration services in connection
with the practice of engineering;
(9) an individual who installs, alters, remodels, maintains, or repairs oil
burners exclusively while employed by a supplier of home heating fuel; or
(10) an individual regularly employed by the owner of property, or the
owner’s agent, to engage in maintenance and repair work.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 386
9A–201.
There is a State Board of Heating, Ventilation, Air–Conditioning, and Refrigeration
Contractors in the Department.
9A–301.
Except as otherwise provided in this title, an individual shall be licensed by the
Board before the individual provides or assists in providing heating, ventilation,
air–conditioning, or refrigeration services in the State.
9A–501.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “SELLER” MEANS A PERSON THAT OWNS A BUSINESS
THAT HAS A GROSS ANNUAL REVENUE OF $100,000 OR MORE FROM THE SALE OF
HEATING, VENTILATION, AIR–CONDITIONING, OR REFRIGERATION EQUIPMENT.
(B) (1) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A PERSON WHO:
(I) SELLS CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS OTHER THAN
MATERIALS INVOLVED IN THE INSTALLATION OF HEATING, VENTILATION,
AIR–CONDITIONING, OR REFRIGERATION EQUIPMENT; AND
(II) DERIVES LESS THAN 25% OF THE PERSON’S REVENUES
FROM THE SALE OF HEATING, VENTILATION, AIR–CONDITIONING, OR
REFRIGERATION EQUIPMENT.
(2) A PERSON MAY NOT KNOWINGLY SELL OR OFFER TO SELL
HEATING, VENTILATION, AIR–CONDITIONING, OR REFRIGERATION EQUIPMENT TO
ANOTHER PERSON, UNLESS THE INDIVIDUAL PURCHASING THE EQUIPMENT:
(1) (I) IS LICENSED BY HOLDS A MASTER LICENSE, A MASTER
RESTRICTED LICENSE, OR A LIMITED LICENSE OR EMPLOYS AN INDIVIDUAL
LICENSED BY THE WHO HOLDS A MASTER LICENSE, A MASTER RESTRICTED LICENSE,
OR A LIMITED LICENSE ISSUED BY THE BOARD TO PROVIDE OR ASSIST IN PROVIDING
HEATING, VENTILATION, AIR–CONDITIONING, OR REFRIGERATION SERVICES;
(II) OPERATES A BUSINESS THAT RESELLS HEATING,
VENTILATION, AIR–CONDITIONING, OR REFRIGERATION EQUIPMENT TO
INDIVIDUALS LICENSED BY THE BOARD; OR
(2) (III) IS NOT REQUIRED TO BE LICENSED UNDER § 9A–103 OF
THIS TITLE.
– 3 –

Ch. 386 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(C) (B) (1) A PERSON THAT SELLS HEATING, VENTILATION,
AIR–CONDITIONING, OR REFRIGERATION EQUIPMENT SHALL COLLECT THE NAME
AND LICENSE NUMBER OF AN INDIVIDUAL WHO PURCHASES HEATING,
VENTILATION, AIR–CONDITIONING, OR REFRIGERATION EQUIPMENT AT THE TIME
OF SALE.
(2) IF A PERSON IS NOT ABLE TO COLLECT THE NAME AND LICENSE
NUMBER OF AN INDIVIDUAL WHO PURCHASED EQUIPMENT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE PERSON SHALL, AT THE TIME OF SALE, PROVIDE A
WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE INDIVIDUAL WITH PURCHASING THE EQUIPMENT THAT
CONTAINS INFORMATION PRESCRIBED BY THE BOARD REGARDING THE
REQUIREMENT THAT AN INDIVIDUAL BE LICENSED BY THE BOARD BEFORE
PROVIDING OR ASSISTING IN PROVIDING HEATING, VENTILATION,
AIR–CONDITIONING, OR REFRIGERATION SERVICES IN THE STATE, INCLUDING THE
INSTALLATION OF HEATING, VENTILATION, AIR–CONDITIONING, OR
REFRIGERATION EQUIPMENT.
(D) A SELLER SHALL FILE A REPORT WITH THE BOARD WITHIN 1 MONTH
AFTER THE END OF EACH FISCAL YEAR THAT LISTS THE NAME AND LICENSE NUMBER
OF EACH INDIVIDUAL THAT PURCHASED HEATING, VENTILATION,
AIR–CONDITIONING, OR REFRIGERATION EQUIPMENT FROM THE SELLER DURING
THE PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR.
(E) (C) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, THE BOARD SHALL ADOPT
REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
9A–505.
(a) (1) In this section, “officer” includes a superintendent, manager, or agent
of a corporation regardless of whether the corporation provides heating, ventilation,
air–conditioning, or refrigeration services.
(2) Any person, including an officer, who violates § 9A–501, § 9A–502, §
9A–503, or § 9A–504 of this subtitle is guilty of a misdemeanor, and on conviction is subject
to a fine not exceeding $1,000 or imprisonment not exceeding 6 months or both and, on a
second or subsequent conviction, subject to a fine not exceeding $5,000 or imprisonment
not exceeding 2 years or both.
(3) ANY PERSON, INCLUDING AN OFFICER, WHO VIOLATES § 9A–501.1
OF THIS SUBTITLE IS SUBJECT TO:
(I) FOR A FIRST VIOLATION, A CIVIL PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING
$1,000; AND
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 386
(II) FOR A SECOND OR SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION, A CIVIL
PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING $5,000.
(b) Any person who violates any provision of § 9A–402 of this title is guilty of a
misdemeanor, and on conviction is subject to a fine not exceeding $1,000 or imprisonment
not exceeding 6 months or both.
(c) (1) Except as otherwise provided by this title, the Board may impose on a
person who violates any provision of this title a penalty not exceeding $5,000 for each
violation.
(2) In setting the amount of the penalty, the Board shall consider:
(i) the seriousness of the violation;
(ii) the harm caused by the violation;
(iii) the good faith of the violator;
(iv) any history of previous violations by the violator; and
(v) any other relevant factors.
(3) The Board shall pay any penalty collected under this subsection into
the General Fund of the State.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 5 –